de: Textur der Nussbutter: Grob; Cremig; Crunchy; Extra Crunchy; Gemischte Textur; Gepulvert; Glatt; Aufgeschlagen; Andere
sl-SI: Tekstura oreškovega masla: S koščki; Kremasta; Hrustljava; Ekstra hrustljava; Mešana tekstura; V prahu; Gladka; Stepana; Drugo
ro-RO: Textura untului de nuci: Cu bucăți; Cremos; Crocant; Extra crocant; Textură mixtă; Pudră; Fin; Aerat; Altele
da: Tekstur for nøddesmør: Grov (Chunky); Cremet; Knasende; Ekstra knasende; Blandet konsistens; Pulveriseret; Blød; Pisket; Andet
nl: Notenboter textuur: Grof; Romig; Knapperig; Extra knapperig; Gemengde textuur; In poedervorm; Glad; Opgeklopt; Overig
th: เนื้อสัมผัสของเนยถั่ว: มีเนื้อถั่วผสม; เนื้อครีม; กรุบกรอบ; กรุบกรอบพิเศษ; เนื้อสัมผัสผสม; แบบผง; เนื้อเนียน; วิป; อื่นๆ
it: Consistenza del burro di frutta secca: Con pezzi; Cremoso; Croccante; Extra croccante; Consistenza mista; In polvere; Vellutato; Montato; Altro
sv: Nötsmörskonsistens: Med bitar; Krämig; Crunchy; Extra crunchy; Blandad konsistens; Pulver; Slät; Vispad; Övrigt
fi: Pähkinävoin koostumus: Karkea; Kermainen; Rapea; Erittäin rapea; Sekatekstuuri; Jauhemainen; Sileä; Vaahdotettu; Muu
ru: Текстура ореховой пасты: С кусочками; Кремовая; Хрустящая; Суперхрустящая; Смешанная текстура; В порошке; Однородная; Взбитая; Другое
zh-CN: 坚果酱质地: 粗颗粒; 细腻; 颗粒; 特级颗粒; 混合质地; 粉末状; 幼滑; 搅打状; 其他
sk-SK: Textúra orechového masla: S kúskami; Krémová; Chrumkavá; Extra chrumkavá; Zmiešaná textúra; Prášková; Jemná; Šľahaná; Iná
hr-HR: Tekstura maslaca od orašastih plodova: S komadićima; Kremasto; Hrskavo; Ekstra hrskavo; Miješana tekstura; U prahu; Glatko; Tučeno; Ostalo
ko: 견과류 버터 질감: 청키; 크리미; 크런치; 엑스트라 크런치; 혼합 텍스처; 분말; 스무스; 휩; 기타
lt-LT: Riešutų sviesto tekstūra: Su gabaliukais; Kreminė; Traški; Ypač traški; Mišrios tekstūros; Miltelių pavidalo; Vientisa; Plakta; Kita
bg-BG: Текстура на ядково масло: С едри парченца; Кремообразно; Хрупкаво; Екстра хрупкаво; Смесена текстура; На прах; Гладко; Разбито; Друго
zh-TW: 堅果醬質地: 顆粒感; 滑順; 鬆脆; 激脆; 綜合口感; 粉狀; 柔滑; 打發; 其他
hu: Mogyoróvaj textúrája: Darabos; Krémes; Ropogós; Extra ropogós; Kevert textúra; Porított; Sima; Habosított; Egyéb
ja: ナッツバターの質感: チャンキー; クリーミー; クランチー; エクストラクランチー; ミックステクスチャー; パウダー状; スムース; ホイップ; その他
fr: Texture du beurre de fruits à coque: Avec morceaux; Crémeux; Croustillant; Extra croustillant; Texture mixte; En poudre; Lisse; Fouetté; Autre
cs: Textura ořechového másla: S kousky; Krémová; Křupavá; Extra křupavá; Smíšená textura; V prášku; Jemná; Šlehaná; Ostatní
pl: Tekstura masła orzechowego: Z kawałkami; Kremowe; Chrupiące; Bardzo chrupiące; Mieszana konsystencja; W proszku; Gładkie; Ubijane; Inna
nb: Konsistens på nøttesmør: Grov; Kremet; Crunchy; Ekstra crunchy; Blandet tekstur; I pulverform; Glatt; Pisket; Annet
el: Υφή βουτύρου ξηρών καρπών: Με κομμάτια; Κρεμώδης; Τραγανή; Πολύ τραγανή; Μεικτή υφή; Σε σκόνη; Λεία; Χτυπημένη; Άλλο
vi: Kết cấu bơ hạt: Có hạt vụn; Kem mịn; Giòn; Siêu giòn; Kết cấu hỗn hợp; Bột; Mịn; Đánh bông; Khác
en: Nut butter texture: Chunky; Creamy; Crunchy; Extra Crunchy; Mixed Texture; Powdered; Smooth; Whipped; Other
tr: Kuruyemiş ezmesi dokusu: Parçacıklı; Kremamsı; Çıtır; Ekstra çıtır; Karışık dokulu; Toz; Pürüzsüz; Çırpılmış; Diğer
pt-PT: textura da manteiga de frutos secos: Com pedaços; Cremosa; Crocante; Extra crocante; Textura mista; Em pó; Suave; Batida; Outra
es: Textura de la mantequilla de frutos secos: Con trozos; Cremosa; Crujiente; Extra crujiente; Textura mixta; En polvo; Suave; Batida; Otro
pt-BR: Pasta de oleaginosas textura: Com pedaços; Cremosa; Crocante; Extra crocante; Textura mista; Em pó; Lisa; Batida; Outro